src-fst-morphology-stems-adjectives.lexc.md
# North Sámi adjective lexicon

* **LEXICON LEXATTR  ** This lexicon is here to give the tags to the compounding

* **LEXICON At    ** gives +A+Attr and directs to K

* **LEXICON PrfPrc ** Gives +A+Attr and Sg/Pl Nom and directs to K

* **LEXICON FINJU- ** compounds only, directs to Rreal and NAMAT

* **LEXICON ALIT ** Both second-part compound and independent adj.
čáhppesalit bábir, alit bábir

* **LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective ** is a long list of lexicalised eahpe-prefixed adjs

* **LEXICON NomActVEARA ** hardcoded postposition frases with veara, for speller

* **LEXICON Adjective ** is the main adjective list

* **LEXICON AdjectivePx ** Px-forms are restricted to this lexicon
Move adjs that may take Px from **Adjective** to this lexicon.

* **LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx ** is the main adjective list, not taking Px

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
